Nevada, session 83, AB384.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. Chapter 62B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Chair of the Commission shall solicit input from
persons, organizations and entities who have knowledge and
experience in matters relating to wrap-around services for
children who are or were in the juvenile justice system, including,
without limitation, children who are or were on probation or who
are or were released from a local facility for the detention of
children, regional facility for the treatment and rehabilitation of
children or state facility for the detention of children.
2. The Chair shall solicit input from such persons,
organizations and entities regarding:
(a) Issues relating to the availability of wrap-around services;
(b) The scope and different types of wrap-around services that
are offered to children and their families, including, without
limitation:
(1) Evidence-based home and community services;
(2) Evidence-based reentry programs or services; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(3) Mentorship or other necessary services relating to the
needs of children who are or were in the juvenile justice system
and their families; and
(c) Any other matters relating to wrap-around services that are
deemed relevant by the Chair.
3. On or before March 1 of each year, the Chair shall prepare
an annual report that includes, without limitation, a summary of
actions performed pursuant to this section during the previous
year and any findings and recommendations relating to wrap-
around services or the juvenile justice system in general. The
report must be submitted to:
(a) The Commission; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on the
Judiciary, if the report is received during an odd-numbered year,
or to the next session of the Legislature, if the report is received
during an even-numbered year.
Sec. 10. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)